Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 2. Composition and Members.

Sec. 24.05.020.
Composition.

The legislature is composed of two houses: a senate consisting of 20 members and a house of representatives consisting of 40 members.

History.

(§ 2 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 1.

Sec. 24.05.030.
Qualifications of members.

A member of the legislature shall be a qualified voter who has been a resident of the state for at least three years and of the district from which elected for at least one year immediately preceding filing for office.
A senator shall be at least 25 years of age and a representative at least 21 years of age at the time of taking the oath of office.

History.

(§ 3 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 2.

Collateral references. —

63A Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 48-56

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 38.

81A C.J.S., States, § 42.

Legislative power to prescribe qualifications for or conditions of eligibility to constitutional office. 34 ALR2d 155.

Sec. 24.05.040.
Dual office.

A member of the legislature may not hold any other office or position of profit under the United States or the state. During the term for which elected and for one year thereafter, a legislator may not be nominated, elected, or appointed to any other office or position of profit which has been created, or the salary or emoluments of which have been increased, while the legislator was a member.
This section does not prevent any person from seeking or holding the office of governor, lieutenant governor, or member of Congress.
This section does not apply to employment by or election to a constitutional convention.
A member may serve on or at the behest of an interim committee of the legislature.

History.

(§ 4 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1965; am § 56 ch 69 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1971, “lieutenant governor” was substituted for “secretary of state” to conform to the 1970 constitutional amendment changing the designation of that office.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 5.

Sec. 24.05.050.
Membership on boards and commissions.

A member of the legislature may serve on a board or commission of the state government only if the membership of legislators on the board or commission is specifically authorized by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 1966)

Sec. 24.05.060.
Disqualifications.

A person is not qualified for membership in the legislature who is disqualified to hold public office under the provisions of art. XII, § 4, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and as it may be implemented by law.
Each member of the legislature, before entering upon the duties of the office, shall take the oath of office prescribed in art. XII, § 5, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and such further oath or affirmation prescribed by law for members of the legislature or other officers of the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 70-84

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 56.

81A C.J.S., States, § 94.

Sec. 24.05.070.
Election and expulsion.

Each member of the legislature shall be elected from the district and in conformity with the procedures established by the state constitution and the laws of the state.
Each house is the judge of the election and qualifications of its members and may expel a member with the concurrence of two-thirds of its members.

History.

(§ 6 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 12.

Sec. 24.05.080.
Terms.

The term of each member of the legislature begins on the third Tuesday in January. The term of representatives is two years, and the term of senators is four years. One-half of the senators shall be elected every two years.

History.

(§ 7 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1969; am § 33 ch 53 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 143 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1996; am § 35 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 3.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 44.

81A C.J.S., States, § 43.

Sec. 24.05.085.
Resignation.

A member resigns by submitting a resignation in writing to the presiding officer of the house to which the member was elected or appointed, with information copies to the governor, the director of elections, and the executive director of the Legislative Affairs Agency for appropriate administrative action. The resignation is effective on the date specified in the resignation or, if no date is specified, 10 days after the date of mailing the resignation. The resignation may be withdrawn, in the same manner as it was submitted, at any time before it becomes effective.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 34 ch 53 SLA 1973; am § 31 ch 67 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For filling a vacancy in the legislature, see AS

15.40.320

—

15.40.470

.

Sec. 24.05.087.
[Renumbered as AS 24.05.184.]